New York, session 2025-2026, A5814.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 510-e to read as follows: 3 § 510-e. Suspension of registration; cashless toll violations. 1. For 4 the purpose of this section: 5 (a) "Owner" shall mean any person, corporation, partnership, firm, 6 agency, association, lessor or organization who, at the time of incur- 7 ring an obligation to pay a toll at a cashless tolling facility, and 8 with respect to the vehicle identified in the notice of toll due: (i) is 9 the beneficial or equitable owner of such vehicle; or (ii) has title to 10 such vehicle; or (iii) is the registrant or co-registrant of such vehi- 11 cle which is registered with the department of motor vehicles of this 12 state or any other state, territory, district, province, nation or other 13 jurisdiction; or (iv) is a person entitled to the use and possession of 14 a vehicle subject to a security interest in another person. 15 (b) "Cashless tolling facility" shall mean a toll highway, bridge or 16 tunnel facility operated by a public authority that does not provide for 17 the immediate on-site payment in cash of a toll owed for the use of such 18 facility. 19 (c) "Violation" shall mean the failure of the owner to timely respond 20 to a toll bill. 21 (d) "Toll bill" shall mean a notice sent to an owner by a public 22 authority notifying such owner that the owner's vehicle has been used or 23 operated at a cashless tolling facility, crossed a cashless tolling 24 monitoring system without an operable electronic device and has incurred 25 an obligation to pay a toll. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06123-01-5 A. 5814 2 1 2. No suspension of registration of a motor vehicle shall occur pursu- 2 ant to this article for any cashless toll violation unless there is 3 clear evidence the owner of such motor vehicle's intent to repeatedly 4 evade paying such cashless tolls. Beginning October thirteenth, two 5 thousand twenty, any current suspension of registration of a motor vehi- 6 cle for any cashless toll violation which lack clear evidence of an 7 owner's intent to repeatedly evade paying such cashless tolls shall be 8 reversed without penalty to such owner of such vehicle. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.